Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-1102
Applicability of act.

The creation of security interests and pledges by governmental units is controlled by other provisions of law. The Nebraska Governmental Unit Security Interest Act governs the perfection, priority, and enforcement of all security interests created by governmental units.

Laws 2000, LB 929, § 18.